Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 2 Contracts of Officers of State Institutions with State Institutions

45-10-40.
Contracting with state institutions not allowed; exceptions.

No member of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia or of the Board of Human Services, no trustee or other officer of any institution which is wholly or in part supported by state funds, and no partnership of which such person is a member shall make any contract with the governing board or trustees of such institution or any officer of such institution for the sale and purchase of merchandise or supplies for such institution whereby profit shall accrue to such board member or trustee or such partnership of which such person is a member. Such trustee or officer of such institution shall not make any profit or receive any money for the sale, handling, or disposal of any crop or crops or property of such institution. Such member, trustee, or other officer of such institution shall not make or be interested in any contract for supplies or merchandise for such institution when such contract or the making of the same is wholly or in part made or influenced by the action of the board governing such institution or the trustees thereof or is controlled by any officer of such institution; and any and all such contracts are declared to be illegal and void, provided that any such contracts as are described in this Code section may be made with a corporation of which any such board member or trustee is a stockholder if such member or trustee does not vote on or participate in the making of such contract. No board member or trustee of such institution shall be prohibited from making contracts for furnishing supplies to the students or faculty of such institution for their individual use.

History.

Ga. L. 1918, p. 265, § 1; Code 1933, § 89-904; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-3/HB 228.

45-10-41.
Penalty for profiting from contracts with state institutions generally; discharge from office.

Any member of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia or of the Board of Human Services or any trustee or other officer of any institution supported wholly or in part by state funds who violates Code Section 45-10-40 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as prescribed in Code Section 17-10-3. If any member of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia or of the Board of Human Services is found guilty of violating Code Section 45-10-40, his office shall become vacant; and it is the duty of the Governor, where the power to fill the vacancy is lodged in the Governor, to appoint some other person to fill the vacancy. If any trustee or other officer of such institution is found guilty of violating Code Section 45-10-40, he shall be discharged from his office in such institution and shall not be eligible to be reelected or reappointed to such office; and the vacancy shall be filled by the board or the authority which, under the law, has the right to fill such vacancy.

History.

Ga. L. 1918, p. 266, § 2; Code 1933, § 89-9915; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-3/HB 228.

45-10-42.
Reporters for State Board of Workers’ Compensation may sell transcripts to state agencies.

Notwithstanding any other provision of Part 1 of this article or any other provision of this Code, public officers and employees who are reporters for the State Board of Workers’ Compensation may, for themselves or on behalf of any business entity, when providing transcripts of records to parties under subsection (g) of Code Section 34-9-102, sell such transcripts to any agency of the state and receive compensation therefor.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 719, § 2.